Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2643.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 10, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1380, to read: START_STATUTE33-1380. Consumer fraud; enforcement A landlord's violation of this chapter is deemed to be a violation of title 44, cHapter 10, article 7, CONSTITUTES AN unlawful PRACTICE under section 44-1522 and is subject to ENFORCEMENT UNDER TITLE 44, CHAPTER 10, ARTICLE 7. END_STATUTE